apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_2_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_3_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_4_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_5_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_6_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
!	kotus_7_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_8_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_9_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_11_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_12_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_13_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_14_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_16_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_17_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_18_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_20_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_21_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_26_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_27_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_32_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_33_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_34_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_35_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_36_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_37_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_39_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_40_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_41_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_43_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_47_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	kotus_48_ADJECTIVE/stub	 ;
	exceptional_10_ADJECTIVE/stub	;
	kotus_99_ADJECTIVE	;

LEXICON Verbs
	kotus_52_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_53_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_54_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_55_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_56_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_57_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_58_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_59_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_60_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_61_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_62_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_63_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_64_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_65_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_66_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_67_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_68_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_69_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_70_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_71_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_72_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_73_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_74_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_75_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_76_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_77_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_78_VERB/stub	;
	exceptional_67_VERB/stub	;
	kotus_99_VERB	;

LEXICON ProperNouns
	kotus_1_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_2_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_3_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_4_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_5_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_6_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_7_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_8_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_9_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_10_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_11_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_12_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_13_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_14_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_17_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_18_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_19_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_20_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_21_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_22_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_24_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_25_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_26_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_27_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_32_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_38_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_39_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_40_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_41_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_42_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_48_PROPER/stub;
	kotus_49_PROPER/stub;


LEXICON Ennd
[BOUNDARY=ULTIMATE]:{##}	#	;



LEXICON kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stub
ahkera'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:ahker{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
hankala'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:hankal{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
hyvä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:hyv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
ihana'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:ihan{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
jännittävä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:jännittäv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
järkevä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:järkev{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
katala'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:katal{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
katkera'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:katker{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kavala'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kaval{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kestävä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kestäv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kiiltävä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kiiltäv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kitkerä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kitker{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kova'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kov{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kuiva'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kuiv{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kuuluisa'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kuuluis{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kuuma'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kuum{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kylmä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:kylm{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
köyhä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:köyh{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
lihava'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:lihav{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
luotettava'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:luotettav{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
matala'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:matal{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
mukava'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:mukav{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
musta'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:must{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
nopsa'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:nops{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
oma'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:om{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
ovela'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:ovel{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
pysyvä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:pysyv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
ruma'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:rum{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
sopiva'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:sopiv{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
suora'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:suor{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
syvä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:syv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
taitava'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:taitav{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
terävä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:teräv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
tumma'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:tumm{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
tyhjä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:tyhj{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
tyhmä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:tyhm{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
tylsä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:tyls{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
typerä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:typer{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
vakava'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:vakav{^a}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
väljä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:välj{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
epämiellyttävä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:epä{#}miellyttäv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
epäselvä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:epä{#}selv{^ä}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
LEXICON exceptional_10_ADJECTIVE/stub
pitkä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10]:pi{^ä}	exceptional_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stub
hieno'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=1]:hieno	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
huono'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=1]:huono	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
iso'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=1]:iso	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
paksu'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=1]:paksu	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
perso'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=1]:perso	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
piru'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=1]:piru	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stub
jyrkkä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10][KAV=A]:jyrk{k~~}{^ä}{A}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stub
märkä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10][KAV=D]:mär{k~~}{^ä}{D}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
mätä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=10][KAV=F]:mä{t~~}{^ä}{F}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stub
kapea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:kape{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kauhea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:kauhe{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kipeä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:kipe{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
korkea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:korke{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
leveä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:leve{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
litteä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:litte{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
makea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:make{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
nopea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:nope{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
pehmeä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:pehme{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
pimeä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:pime{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
pyöreä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:pyöre{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
ruskea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:ruske{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
selkeä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:selke{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
sokea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:soke{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
tärkeä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:tärke{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
vaikea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:vaike{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
valkea'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:valke{^a}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
vihreä'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=15]:vihre{^ä}	kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;

LEXICON Conjunctions
ehkä'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG1]:ehken Ennd ;
elikkä'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=COORD]:elikkä	Ennd	;
että'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL2]:ettette Ennd ;
joko'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=COORD]:joko	Ennd	;
jos'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=PL1]:jossemme Ennd ;
jos'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG1]:jollen Ennd ;
jos'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD]:jos	Ennd	;
konsa'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD]:konsa	Ennd	;
kuin'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=COORD]:kuin	Ennd	;
kun'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG3]:kunnei Ennd ;
miksi'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG3]:miksei Ennd ;
mutta'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD]:mutta	Ennd	;
sekä'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=COORD]:sekä	Ennd	;
siksi'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG1]:siksen Ennd ;
taikka'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD]:taikka	Ennd	;
vaikka'][POS=CONJUNCTION][SUBCAT=SUBORD][BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][LEMMA='ei'][POS=VERB][SUBCAT=NEG][VOICE=ACT][PRS=SG2]:vaikket Ennd ;
LEXICON Interjections
ah'][POS=INTERJECTION]:ah	Ennd	;
ha'][POS=INTERJECTION]:ha	Ennd	;
heippa'][POS=INTERJECTION]:heippa	Ennd	;
hi'][POS=INTERJECTION]:hi	Ennd	;
hui'][POS=INTERJECTION]:hui	Ennd	;
hys'][POS=INTERJECTION]:hys	Ennd	;
jaha'][POS=INTERJECTION]:jaha	Ennd	;
jukoliste'][POS=INTERJECTION]:jukoliste	Ennd	;
kas'][POS=INTERJECTION]:kas	Ennd	;
moi'][POS=INTERJECTION]:moi	Ennd	;
nöf'][POS=INTERJECTION]:nöf	Ennd	;
oijoi'][POS=INTERJECTION]:oijoi	Ennd	;
pyh'][POS=INTERJECTION]:pyh	Ennd	;
top'][POS=INTERJECTION]:top	Ennd	;
vau'][POS=INTERJECTION]:vau	Ennd	;
hm'][POS=INTERJECTION]:hm	Ennd	;
kääk'][POS=INTERJECTION]:kääk	Ennd	;
seis'][POS=INTERJECTION]:seis	Ennd	;
LEXICON Particles
aika'][POS=PARTICLE]:aika	Ennd	;
à% la'][POS=PARTICLE]:à% la	Ennd	;
arviolta'][POS=PARTICLE]:arviolta	Ennd	;
ensi'][POS=PARTICLE]:ensi	Ennd	;
erittäin'][POS=PARTICLE]:erittäin	Ennd	;
hela'][POS=PARTICLE]:hela	Ennd	;
huit'][POS=PARTICLE]:huit	Ennd	;
hyvänsä'][POS=PARTICLE]:hyvänsä	Ennd	;
in'][POS=PARTICLE]:in	Ennd	;
jospa'][POS=PARTICLE]:jospa	Ennd	;
kai'][POS=PARTICLE]:kai	Ennd	;
kanttuvei'][POS=PARTICLE]:kanttuvei	Ennd	;
kerta% kaikkiaan'][POS=PARTICLE]:kerta% kaikkiaan	Ennd	;
kukku'][POS=PARTICLE]:kukku	Ennd	;
kyllä'][POS=PARTICLE]:kyllä	Ennd	;
liki'][POS=PARTICLE]:liki	Ennd	;
melkein'][POS=PARTICLE]:melkein	Ennd	;
muuten'][POS=PARTICLE]:muuten	Ennd	;
nimenomaan'][POS=PARTICLE]:nimenomaan	Ennd	;
näin'][POS=PARTICLE]:näin	Ennd	;
omiansa'][POS=PARTICLE]:omiansa	Ennd	;
perin'][POS=PARTICLE]:perin	Ennd	;
pohjimmiltaan'][POS=PARTICLE]:pohjimmiltaan	Ennd	;
salon'][POS=PARTICLE]:salon	Ennd	;
semminkään'][POS=PARTICLE]:semminkään	Ennd	;
siitä'][POS=PARTICLE]:siitä	Ennd	;
sinänsä'][POS=PARTICLE]:sinänsä	Ennd	;
sorry'][POS=PARTICLE]:sorry	Ennd	;
sun'][POS=PARTICLE]:sun	Ennd	;
taka'][POS=PARTICLE]:taka	Ennd	;
tietenkin'][POS=PARTICLE]:tietenkin	Ennd	;
tokko'][POS=PARTICLE]:tokko	Ennd	;
tuskin'][POS=PARTICLE]:tuskin	Ennd	;
täpösen'][POS=PARTICLE]:täpösen	Ennd	;
vaari'][POS=PARTICLE]:vaari	Ennd	;
varmaan'][POS=PARTICLE]:varmaan	Ennd	;
via'][POS=PARTICLE]:via	Ennd	;
vähäisen'][POS=PARTICLE]:vähäisen	Ennd	;
yksinomaan'][POS=PARTICLE]:yksinomaan	Ennd	;
fifty-fifty'][POS=PARTICLE]:fifty{#}fifty	Ennd	;
samperi'][POS=PARTICLE][KTN=6]:samperi	Ennd	;
keralle'][POS=PARTICLE]:keralle	Ennd	;
erityisen'][POS=PARTICLE]:erityisen	Ennd	;
jaha'][POS=PARTICLE]:jaha	Ennd	;
juu'][POS=PARTICLE]:juu	Ennd	;
kun'][POS=PARTICLE]:kun	Ennd	;
mitens'][POS=PARTICLE]:mitens	Ennd	;
niinkun'][POS=PARTICLE]:niinkun	Ennd	;
okei'][POS=PARTICLE]:okei	Ennd	;
saakka'][POS=PARTICLE]:saakka	Ennd	;
sitävastoin'][POS=PARTICLE]:sitävastoin	Ennd	;
tota'][POS=PARTICLE]:tota	Ennd	;
vaikka'][POS=PARTICLE]:vaikka	Ennd	;
yks'][POS=PARTICLE]:yks	Ennd	;
niinkuin'][POS=PARTICLE]:niinkuin	Ennd	;
